Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB268.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 631.2. Cost-Sharing Calculation.--(a) When calculating an insured's contribution to an applicable cost-sharing requirement under a health insurance policy:(1) The insurer shall include any cost-sharing amounts paid by the insured or on behalf of the insured by another person.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (2) A pharmacy benefits manager that administers pharmacy benefits for the insurer shall include any cost-sharing amounts paid by the insured or on behalf of the insured by another person.(b) This section shall apply to a health insurance policy issued or entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.(c) As used in this section:"Cost-sharing" means the cost to an individual insured under a health insurance policy according to a coverage limit, copayment, coinsurance, deductible or other out-of-pocket expense requirements imposed by the policy, contract or agreement."Covered entity" means a contract holder or policy holder providing pharmacy benefits to a covered individual under a health insurance policy pursuant to a contract administered by a pharma cy benefits m anager. "Health insurance policy" means:(1) An individual or group health, sickness or accident policy, or subscriber contract or certificate offered, issued or renewed by an entity subject to one of the following:(i) This act.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, hospital indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, Civilian Health 20250SB0268PN0221 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement, long-term care or disability income, workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance."Pharmacy benefits manager" means a person, business or other entity that performs pharmacy benefits management for covered entities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0268PN0221 - 3 - 1234567